Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-917
Clerk of the district court; duties relating to mental health board.

The clerk of the district court appointed for that purpose by a district judge of that district court judicial district shall sign and issue all notices, appointments, warrants, subpoenas, or other process required to be issued by the mental health board and shall affix his or her seal as clerk of the district court. The clerk shall file and preserve in his or her office all papers connected with any proceedings of the mental health board and all related notices, reports, and other communications. The clerk shall keep minutes of all proceedings of the board. All required notices, reports, and communications may be sent by mail unless otherwise provided in the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act. The fact and date that such notices, reports, and communications have been sent and received shall be noted on the proper record.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 16;

Laws 1981, LB 95, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 884, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 83-1016;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 37;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 36.

Sex Offender Commitment Act, see section 71-1201.